District of Columbia statutes.
2-1321

Established.

There is hereby established a Commission on Latino Community Development to advise the Mayor, the Director of the Office on Latino Affairs, the Council, and the public concerning the views and needs of the Latino community in the District of Columbia.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 2543
Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 9(c)(2), 28 DCR 3425
This section is referenced in § 2-1302.
1981 Ed., § 1-2321.
1973 Ed., § 6-1921.